Utah statutes.
20A-6-105.   Provisional ballot envelopes.

(1)  Each election officer shall ensure that provisional ballot envelopes are printed in substantially the following form:

"AFFIRMATION

Are you a citizen of the United States of America?  Yes  No

Will you be 18 years old on or before election day? Yes  No

If you checked "no" in response to either of the two above questions, do not complete this form.

Name of Voter _________________________________________________________

First 			Middle			Last

Driver License or Identification Card Number _________________________________

State of Issuance of Driver License or Identification Card Number _________________

Date of Birth ___________________________________________________________

Street Address of Principal Place of Residence

______________________________________________________________________

City			County			State		Zip Code

Telephone Number (optional) ______________________________________________

Last four digits of Social Security Number ____________________________

Last former address at which I was registered to vote (if known)

______________________________________________________________________

City			County			State		Zip Code

Voting Precinct (if known) _________________________________________________

I, (please print your full name)__________________________do solemnly swear or affirm:

That I am currently registered to vote in the state of Utah and am eligible to vote in this election; that I have not voted in this election in any other precinct; that I am eligible to vote in this precinct; and that I request that I be permitted to vote in this precinct; and

Subject to penalty of law for false statements, that the information contained in this form is true, and that I am a citizen of the United States and a resident of Utah, residing at the above address; and that I am at least 18 years old and have resided in Utah for the 30 days immediately before this election.

Signed ______________________________________________________________________

Dated ______________________________________________________________________

In accordance with Section 20A-3-506, wilfully providing false information above is a class B misdemeanor under Utah law and is punishable by imprisonment and by fine".

"CITIZENSHIP AFFIDAVIT

Name:

Name at birth, if different:

Place of birth:

Date of birth:

Date and place of naturalization (if applicable):

I hereby swear and affirm, under penalties for voting fraud set forth below, that I am a citizen and that to the best of my knowledge and belief the information above is true and correct.

____________________________

Signature of Applicant

In accordance with Section 20A-2-401, the penalty for willfully causing, procuring, or allowing yourself to be registered to vote if you know you are not entitled to register to vote is up to one year in jail and a fine of up to $2,500."

(2)  The provisional ballot envelope shall include:

(a)  a unique number;

(b)  a detachable part that includes the unique number; and

(c)  a telephone number, internet address, or other indicator of a means, in accordance with Section 20A-6-105.5, where the voter can find out if the provisional ballot was counted.

